Nevada, session 83, AB482.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 422.27172 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
422.27172 1. The Director shall include in the State Plan for
Medicaid a requirement that the State pay the nonfederal share of
expenditures incurred for:
(a) Up to a 12-month supply, per prescription, of any type of
drug for contraception or its therapeutic equivalent which is:
(1) Lawfully prescribed or ordered;
(2) Approved by the Food and Drug Administration; and
(3) Dispensed in accordance with NRS 639.28075;
(b) Any type of device for contraception which is lawfully
prescribed or ordered and which has been approved by the Food and
Drug Administration;
(c) Self-administered hormonal contraceptives dispensed by a
pharmacist pursuant to NRS 639.28078;
(d) Insertion or removal of a device for contraception, including,
without limitation, the insertion of such a device at a hospital
immediately after a person gives birth;
(e) A contraceptive injection, including, without limitation, such
an injection immediately after a person gives birth.
(f) Education and counseling relating to the initiation of the use
of contraceptives and any necessary follow-up after initiating such
use;
(g) Management of side effects relating to contraception; [and]
(h) Voluntary sterilization [for women.] ; and
(i) Any clinical services relating to the drugs, devices and
services described in paragraphs (a) to (h), inclusive. Such clinical
services include, without limitation, services to monitor the use
and effectiveness of contraception.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 4 and 5, to
obtain any benefit provided in the Plan pursuant to subsection 1, a
person enrolled in Medicaid must not be required to:
(a) Pay a higher deductible, any copayment or coinsurance; or
(b) Be subject to a longer waiting period or any other condition.
3. The Director shall ensure that the provisions of this section
are carried out in a manner which complies with the requirements
established by the Drug Use Review Board and set forth in the list
of preferred prescription drugs established by the Department
pursuant to NRS 422.4025.
4. The Plan may require a person enrolled in Medicaid to pay a
higher deductible, copayment or coinsurance for a drug for
-
*AB482*

– 3 –
contraception if the person refuses to accept a therapeutic equivalent
of the contraceptive drug.
5. For each method of contraception which is approved by the
Food and Drug Administration, the Plan must include at least one
contraceptive drug or device for which no deductible, copayment or
coinsurance may be charged to the person enrolled in Medicaid, but
the Plan may charge a deductible, copayment or coinsurance for any
other contraceptive drug or device that provides the same method of
contraception. If the Plan requires a person enrolled in Medicaid to
pay a copayment or coinsurance for a drug for contraception, the
Plan may only require the person to pay the copayment or
coinsurance:
(a) Once for the entire amount of the drug dispensed for the plan
year; or
(b) Once for each 1-month supply of the drug dispensed.
6. The Plan must [provide] :
(a) Provide for the reimbursement of a pharmacist for providing
services described in subsection 1 that are within the scope of
practice of the pharmacist to the same extent as if the services were
provided by another provider of health care. The Plan must not
limit:
[(a)] (1) Coverage for such services provided by a pharmacist to
a number of occasions less than the coverage for such services when
provided by another provider of health care.
[(b)] (2) Reimbursement for such services provided by a
pharmacist to an amount less than the amount reimbursed for similar
services provided by a physician, physician assistant or advanced
practice registered nurse.
(b) Provide for the reimbursement of a provider of health care
for providing services described in subsection 1 if the services are
within the scope of practice, training and experience of the
provider of health care.
(c) Provide coverage for the services described in subsection 1
regardless of whether those services are provided in an inpatient
or outpatient setting.
7. The Plan must not require a recipient of Medicaid to obtain
prior authorization for the benefits described in paragraphs (a) and
(c) of subsection 1.
8. The Director shall include in the State Plan for Medicaid a
requirement that the State pay the nonfederal share of
expenditures incurred for the costs of any language translation
services provided to facilitate the provision of any drugs, devices
or services described in subsection 1. The Division shall develop a
methodology establishing a rate of compensation for such
translation services that is cost effective and comparable to the
-
*AB482*

– 4 –
rate paid for translation services by other governmental entities
that arrange for the provision of such services.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Drug Use Review Board” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 422.402.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(c) “Therapeutic equivalent” means a drug which:
(1) Contains an identical amount of the same active
ingredients in the same dosage and method of administration as
another drug;
(2) Is expected to have the same clinical effect when
administered to a patient pursuant to a prescription or order as
another drug; and
(3) Meets any other criteria required by the Food and Drug
Administration for classification as a therapeutic equivalent.
Sec. 2. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 1 of this act becomes effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB482*